Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2922
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-2922 to 29-2936 shall be known and may be cited as the Convicted Sex Offender Act.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 1.

The Convicted Sex Offender Act does not apply to persons previously convicted of a sexual offense but determined not to be mentally disordered under the prior mentally disordered sex offender act. State v. Wragge, 246 Neb. 864, 524 N.W.2d 54 (1994).

The Convicted Sex Offender Act does not apply to persons classified as untreatable or presently untreatable. State v. Sell, 244 Neb. 618, 508 N.W.2d 273 (1993).